Illinois, session 104th, SB2536.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated from the 7Financial Institution Fund to the Department of Financial and 8Professional Regulation:9  For Personal Services.............................4,014,90010  For State Contributions to the State11   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,866,40012  For State Contributions to Social Security..........306,70013  For Group Insurance...............................1,112,20014  For Contractual Services............................276,00015  For Travel..........................................111,20016  For Electronic Data Processing......................186,90017  For Telecommunication Services.......................56,30018  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................10,10019  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses20   of the Department..................................570,00021  For Refunds..........................................15,00022    Total                                          $8,525,700   SB2536- 2 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated from the 3Credit Union Fund to the Department of Financial and 4Professional Regulation:5CREDIT UNION6  For Personal Services.............................2,969,6007  For State Contributions to State8   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,381,0009  For State Contributions to Social Security..........279,00010  For Group Insurance...............................1,012,60011  For Contractual Services............................192,60012  For Travel..........................................175,30013  For Electronic Data Processing.......................78,10014  For Telecommunication Services.......................23,60015  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................4,30016  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses17   of the Department..................................349,00018  For Refunds...........................................2,50019    Total                                          $6,467,600 20    Section 10. The sum of $13,378,200, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Cannabis Regulation 22Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 23Regulation for costs associated with operational expenses of 24the department in relation to the regulation of adult-use 25cannabis.   SB2536- 3 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1    Section 15. The sum of $5,642,600, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Cannabis Regulation 3Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 4Regulation for administration by the Cannabis Regulation 5Oversight Officer for costs as authorized by Section 5-45 of 6the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 7    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 8thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 9purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the Bank and 10Trust Company Fund to the Department of Financial and 11Professional Regulation:12DOMESTIC AND FOREIGN COMMERCIAL BANK REGULATION13  For Personal Services............................11,763,10014  For State Contribution to State15   Employees' Retirement System.....................5,469,40016  For State Contributions to Social Security..........905,10017  For Group Insurance...............................3,784,80018  For Contractual Services............................878,40019  For Travel..........................................820,80020  For Electronic Data Processing......................362,50021  For Telecommunication Services......................109,20022  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................19,60023  For Refunds..........................................25,00024  For Operational Expenses of the  SB2536- 4 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1   Division of Banking................................803,8002  For Corporate Fiduciary Receivership................235,0003    Total                                         $25,176,700 4    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 6purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the 7Pawnbroker Regulation Fund to the Department of Financial and 8Professional Regulation:9PAWNBROKER REGULATION10  For Personal Services...............................173,80011  For State Contributions to State Employees' 12   Retirement System...................................81,00013  For State Contributions to Social Security...........13,40014  For Group Insurance..................................55,30015  For Contractual Services.............................14,10016  For Travel............................................8,00017  For Electronic Data Processing........................5,90018  For Telecommunication Services........................1,90019  For Operation of Auto Equipment.........................40020  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses21   of the Department...................................12,10022  For Refunds...........................................2,00023    Total                                            $367,900 24    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much   SB2536- 5 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 2from the Residential Finance Regulatory Fund to the Department 3of Financial and Professional Regulation:4MORTGAGE BANKING AND THRIFT REGULATION5  For Personal Services.............................2,955,2006  For State Contributions to State7   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,373,8008  For State Contributions to Social Security..........226,3009  For Group Insurance.................................896,40010  For Contractual Services..........................1,689,70011  For Travel...........................................64,90012  For Electronic Data Processing......................144,60013  For Telecommunication Services.......................43,50014  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................7,80015  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses16   of the Department..................................931,60017  For Refunds...........................................5,00018    Total                                          $8,338,800 19    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 20thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 21from the Savings Bank Regulatory Fund to the Department of 22Financial and Professional Regulation:23SAVINGS BANK REGULATION24  For Personal Services...............................263,50025  For State Contributions to State  SB2536- 6 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1   Employees' Retirement System.......................122,5002  For State Contributions to Social Security...........20,2003  For Group Insurance..................................99,6004  For Contractual Services.............................24,8005  For Travel...........................................42,9006  For Electronic Data Processing.......................18,5007  For Telecommunication Services........................5,6008  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................1,1009  For Savings Bank Regulation..........................40,30010    Total                                            $639,000 11    Section 40. The following named amounts, or so much 12thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 13from the Real Estate License Administration Fund to the 14Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:15REAL ESTATE LICENSING AND ENFORCEMENT16  For Personal Services.............................3,935,60017  For State Contributions to State18   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,829,80019  For State Contributions to Social Security..........308,10020  For Group Insurance...............................1,162,00021  For Contractual Services............................304,90022  For Travel...........................................86,70023  For Electronic Data Processing......................140,50024  For Telecommunication Services.......................42,30025  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................7,600  SB2536- 7 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses2   of the Department..................................264,0003  For Refunds..........................................10,0004    Total                                          $8,091,500 5    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 6thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 7from the Appraisal Administration Fund to the Department of 8Financial and Professional Regulation:9APPRAISAL LICENSING10  For Personal Services...............................267,20011  For State Contributions to State12   Employees' Retirement System.......................124,30013  For State Contributions to Social Security...........20,50014  For Group Insurance..................................83,00015  For Contractual Services.............................76,10016  For Travel............................................6,40017  For Electronic Data Processing.......................34,50018  For Telecommunication Services.......................10,40019  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................2,00020  For forwarding real estate appraisal fees21   to the federal government..........................630,00022  For Refunds..........................................20,00023    Total                                          $1,274,400 24    Section 55. The following named amounts, or so much   SB2536- 8 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 2from the General Professions Dedicated Fund to the Department 3of Financial and Professional Regulation:4GENERAL PROFESSIONS5  For Personal Services.............................5,128,0006  For State Contributions to State7   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,411,5008  For State Contributions to Social Security..........399,4009  For Group Insurance...............................1,969,90010  For Contractual Services............................840,40011  For Travel...........................................32,60012  For Electronic Data Processing......................374,50013  For Telecommunication Services......................112,80014  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................20,20015  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses16   of the Department..................................775,00017  For Refunds..........................................50,00018    Total                                         $12,114,300 19    Section 60. The following named amounts, or so much 20thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 21from the Illinois State Dental Disciplinary Fund to the 22Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:23  For Personal Services.............................1,016,30024  For State Contributions to State25   Employees' Retirement System.......................472,800  SB2536- 9 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1  For State Contributions to Social Security...........92,9002  For Group Insurance.................................332,0003  For Contractual Services............................153,4004  For Travel............................................2,2005  For Electronic Data Processing.......................42,0006  For Telecommunication Services.......................12,7007  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................2,4008  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses9   of the Department..................................590,80010  For Refunds..........................................10,00011    Total                                          $2,727,500 12    Section 65. The following named amounts, or so much 13thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 14from the Illinois State Medical Disciplinary Fund to the 15Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:16  For Personal Services.............................6,718,60017  For State Contributions to State18   Employees' Retirement System.....................3,138,10019  For State Contributions to Social Security..........496,00020  For Group Insurance...............................2,456,80021  For Contractual Services..........................1,187,50022  For Travel..........................................147,50023  For Electronic Data Processing......................250,90024  For Telecommunication Services.......................75,50025  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................13,500  SB2536- 10 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses2   of the Department................................2,488,0003  For Refunds..........................................50,0004    Total                                         $17,022,400 5    Section 70. The following named amounts, or so much 6thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 7from the Optometric Licensing and Disciplinary Board Fund to 8the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:9  For Personal Services...............................413,70010  For State Contributions to State11   Employees' Retirement System.......................192,80012  For State Contributions to Social Security...........38,80013  For Group Insurance.................................132,80014  For Contractual Services.............................30,00015  For Travel..............................................30016  For Electronic Data Processing........................7,00017  For Telecommunication Services........................2,20018  For Operation of Auto Equipment.........................50019  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses20   of the Department..................................149,40021  For Refunds..........................................10,00022    Total                                            $977,500 23    Section 75. The following named amounts, or so much 24thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated   SB2536- 11 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1from the Design Professionals Administration and Investigation 2Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 3Regulation:4  For Personal Services...............................858,7005  For State Contributions to State6   Employees' Retirement System.......................399,7007  For State Contributions to Social Security...........65,9008  For Group Insurance.................................359,7009  For Contractual Services............................109,70010  For Travel............................................3,90011  For Electronic Data Processing.......................43,90012  For Telecommunication Services.......................13,30013  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................2,50014  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses15   of the Department..................................113,90016  For Refunds...........................................5,00017    Total                                          $1,976,200 18    Section 80. The following named amounts, or so much 19thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 20from the Illinois State Pharmacy Disciplinary Fund to the 21Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:22  For Personal Services.............................1,711,30023  For State Contributions to State24   Employees' Retirement System.......................795,70025  For State Contributions to Social Security..........131,000  SB2536- 12 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1  For Group Insurance.................................464,8002  For Contractual Services............................277,4003  For Travel...........................................17,8004  For Electronic Data Processing.......................89,1005  For Telecommunication Services.......................26,9006  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................4,8007  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses8   of the Department..................................188,0009  For Refunds...........................................5,00010    Total                                          $3,711,800 11    Section 85. The following named amounts, or so much 12thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 13from the Illinois State Podiatric Disciplinary Fund to the 14Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:15  For Personal Services................................74,20016  For State Contributions to State17   Employees' Retirement System........................34,70018  For State Contributions to Social Security............5,80019  For Group Insurance..................................33,20020  For Contractual Services..............................8,80021  For Travel..............................................40022  For Electronic Data Processing........................3,60023  For Telecommunication Services........................1,10024  For Operation of Auto Equipment.........................30025  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses  SB2536- 13 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1   of the Department...................................68,0002  For Refunds..........................................30,0003    Total                                            $260,100 4    Section 90. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 6from the Registered Certified Public Accountants' 7Administration and Disciplinary Fund to the Department of 8Financial and Professional Regulation:9  For Personal Services.............................1,069,80010  For State Contributions to State11   Employees' Retirement System.......................499,50012  For State Contributions to Social Security...........82,00013  For Group Insurance.................................298,80014  For Contractual Services.............................35,60015  For Travel............................................1,10016  For Electronic Data Processing.......................16,00017  For Telecommunication Services........................4,80018  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................1,00019  For the Administration of the Registered CPA 20   Program............................................235,80021  For Refunds...........................................7,00022    Total                                          $2,251,400 23    Section 95. The following named amounts, or so much 24thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated   SB2536- 14 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1from the Nursing Dedicated and Professional Fund to the 2Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:3  For Personal Services.............................2,590,3004  For State Contributions to State5   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,207,6006  For State Contributions to Social Security..........203,4007  For Group Insurance.................................973,9008  For Contractual Services............................565,8009  For Travel............................................3,50010  For Electronic Data Processing......................169,40011  For Telecommunication Services.......................51,00012  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................9,20013  For Refunds..........................................50,00014    Total                                          $5,824,100 15    Section 100. The sum of $1,714,800 or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the Nursing Dedicated 17and Professional Fund to the Department of Financial and 18Professional Regulation for the establishment and operation of 19an Illinois Center for Nursing. 20    Section 105. The following named amounts, or so much 21thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 22from the Professions Indirect Cost Fund to the Department of 23Financial and Professional Regulation:24  For Personal Services.............................8,350,000  SB2536- 15 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1  For State Contributions to State2   Employees' Retirement System.....................3,883,1003  For State Contributions to Social Security..........682,6004  For Group Insurance...............................2,866,3005  For Contractual Services.........................10,429,9006  For Travel..........................................116,3007  For Commodities......................................70,9008  For Printing.........................................12,0009  For Equipment........................................42,10010  For Electronic Data Processing....................2,252,40011  For Telecommunication Services............................012  For Operation of Auto Equipment...........................013  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses14   of the Department................................5,879,20015    Total                                         $34,584,800 16    Section 110. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 18from the Cemetery Oversight Licensing and Disciplinary Fund to 19the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:20  For Personal Services...............................879,10021  For State Contributions to State22   Employees' Retirement System.......................408,70023  For State Contributions to Social Security...........67,30024  For Group Insurance.................................332,00025  For Contractual Services............................558,700  SB2536- 16 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1  For Travel............................................2,4002  For Electronic Data Processing.......................24,7003  For Telecommunication Services........................7,5004  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................1,4005  For Administration of the Cemetery Oversight Act ....84,3006  For Refunds...........................................2,5007    Total                                          $2,368,600 8    Section 115.The sum of $1,400,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 10Financial and Professional Regulation from the Cemetery Relief 11Fund for grants to units of local government and 12not-for-profit organizations for cemeteries that are 13abandoned, neglected, or are otherwise in need of additional 14care. 15    Section 120. The sum of $362,600, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Financial 17and Professional Regulation from the Real Estate Research and 18Education Fund for costs associated with the operation of the 19Office of Real Estate Research at the University of Illinois. 20    Section 125. The sum of $7,199,200, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Compassionate Use 22of Medical Cannabis Fund to the Department of Financial and 23Professional Regulation for all costs associated with   SB2536- 17 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1operational expenses of the department in relation to the 2regulation of medical cannabis. 3    Section 130. The sum of $234,300, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the Appraisal 5Administration Fund to the Department of Financial and 6Professional Regulation for all costs associated with 7administration of the Real Estate Appraiser Licensing Act of 82002. 9    Section 135. The sum of $2,291,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Division of Real 11Estate General Fund to the Department of Financial and 12Professional Regulation for the ordinary and contingent 13expenses of the Department. 14    Section 140. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the TOMA Consumer 16Protection Fund to the Department of Financial and 17Professional Regulation for costs associated to individuals 18who have suffered monetary loss as a result of violations of 19the Transmitters of Money Act or the Uniform Money 20Transmission Modernization Act. 21    Section 145. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Real Estate   SB2536- 18 -OMB104 00024 AAV 10024 b1Recovery Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 2Regulation for costs associated with the Real Estate License 3Act of 2000. 4    Section 150. The sum of $18,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated frim the Professions 6Licensure Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 7Regulation for costs associated with a new licensing system. 8    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92025.